Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.150

Public hearings.

The legislative body may provide by ordinance for such additional public hearings and notice thereof as it deems to be appropriate in connection with any action contemplated under this chapter.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.150.]